Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2149.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Strategies and Techniques for Unlocking Development in Youth Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Executive functioning." A set of cognitive processes that:(1) Help individuals plan, organize and manage tasks, regulate emotions and control behavior.123456789101112131415161718 (2) Are essential for success in school, work and daily life.(3) Involve various mental abilities, such as working memory, cognitive flexibility and inhibitory control."Fund." The Executive Functioning and Study Skills Fund established under section 8."Metacognition." An awareness of one's own cognitive processes, often involving a conscious attempt to control them."Program." The Executive Functioning and Study Skills Grant Program established under this act."Public school entity." A public school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school or charter school, including a regional or cyber charter school."Self-regulation." The control of one's behavior through the use of:(1) self-monitoring, such as keeping a record of behavior;(2) self-evaluation, such as assessing the information obtained during self-monitoring; or(3) self-reinforcement such as rewarding oneself for appropriate behavior or attaining a goal."Study skills." Strategies and techniques that improve learning and information retention and:(1) Include key areas such as time management, active learning, note-taking and test preparation.(2) The development of which may lead to better academic performance, reduced stress and increased motivation.Section 3. Establishment of program.The Executive Functioning and Study Skills Grant Program is established within the department to equip students in grades 6 20260HB2149PN2775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through 12 with the skills relating to executive functioning, studying, metacognition and self-regulation necessary to succeed academically and professionally in the 21st century economy.Section 4. Purpose of program.The department shall provide grants on an annual basis to public school entities for programming provided to students, either during or after normal school hours, that address metacognition, self-regulation, executive functioning and study skills such as:(1) Goal setting.(2) Planning and time management.(3) Collaborative learning.(4) Self-regulation and organization.(5) Anxiety and stress management.(6) Memory techniques.(7) Independent study.(8) Test preparation.(9) Note-taking skills.Section 5. Duties of department.The department shall perform all functions related to the program, including:(1) The creation of a grant application form.(2) Review and approval of grant applications.(3) The administration and disbursement of grant money under the program.(4) Establishing and conducting informational training sessions for public school entities.(5) Outlining of the grant priorities and process of completion for grant applications.(6) Randomly auditing and monitoring grant recipients to 20260HB2149PN2775 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ensure the appropriate use of grant money.Section 6. Grant applications.(a) Availability.--The department shall make the grant application form under section 5(1) available to public school entities no later than October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter. A grant application, at a minimum, shall include:(1) Contact information for the public school entity.(2) The public school entity's anticipated use of grant money.(3) Attestation by the public school entity that the grant money will be used for the stated purpose on the grant application.(4) Program data, including the estimated number of students served by the program broken down by grade level.(b) Application deadline.--A grant application must be submitted no later than December 15, 2026, and each December 15 thereafter.Section 7. Grant awards.(a) Award deadline.--Grant awards shall be initially awarded by the department no later than February 1, 2027, and each February 1 thereafter.(b) Use of grant money.--(1) Grant money allocated through the program shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing public school entity spending.(2) Nothing in this act shall preclude a public school entity from:(i) Making an application in a subsequent year for the same purpose and amount awarded in a prior year.(ii) Utilizing any other existing funding sources 20260HB2149PN2775 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for programs created for the same purposes stated in this act.(3) Nothing in this act shall preclude an intermediate unit from applying for a grant award under this act for a consortium of public school districts the intermediate unit serves.(c) Distribution formula.--No later than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop a formula to determine the distribution of grant awards under the program. After the development of a distribution formula, the department shall transmit a notice with the distribution formula to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin for public comment. The public comment period shall be at least 30 days.Section 8. Executive Functioning and Study Skills Fund.The Executive Functioning and Study Skills Fund is established in the State Treasury. The fund shall operate in accordance with the following:(1) All money deposited and interest accrued from deposits in the fund shall be appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants in accordance with this act.(2) An administrative action may not prevent the deposit of money into the fund in the fiscal year in which the money is received.(3) The fund shall only be used for the grant awards and money in the fund may not be transferred or diverted to or for any other purpose by administrative action.(4) Money in the fund shall include appropriations and transfers from the General Fund, special funds, Federal funds 20260HB2149PN2775 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other sources of revenue.Section 9. Procurement.A public school entity shall be required to comply with all applicable State and local procurement requirements, policies and procedures when expending grant money.Section 10. Annual report.A public school entity that receives a grant award under this act shall submit a report to the department no later than October 1 of each year that includes pre-assessment and post-assessment data such as:(1) The number of students that participated in a public school entity's program funded by the program, broken down by grade level.(2) Rates of behavior change over the course of the program period.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2149PN2775 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617